Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 91.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8210
Comprehensive level trauma center, defined.

Comprehensive level trauma center means a trauma center which (1) provides the highest level of definitive, comprehensive care for patients with complex traumatic injury, (2) provides an emergency trauma team available within fifteen minutes, twenty-four hours per day, including inhouse, immediately available personnel who can initiate surgery and appropriate equipment for pediatric trauma patients in the emergency department, intensive care unit, and operating room, and (3) is responsible for research, education, and outreach programs for trauma.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 10;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 91.